Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 4 Equitable Interpleader

Cross references.

Interpleader generally, §

9-11-22

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on insurance, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 179 (2009).

23-3-90.
Interpleader; when compelled; taxing of costs, attorney’s fees.

Whenever a person is possessed of property or funds or owes a debt or duty, to which more than one person lays claim of such a character as to render it doubtful or dangerous for the holder to act, he may apply to equity to compel the claimants to interplead.

If the person bringing the action has to make or incur any expenses in so doing, including attorney’s fees, the amount so incurred shall be taxed in the bill of costs, under the approval of the court, the court in its discretion determining the amount of the attorney’s fees, and shall be paid by the parties cast in the action as other costs are paid.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3156; Code 1868, § 3168; Code 1873, § 3235; Code 1882, § 3235; Civil Code 1895, § 4896; Civil Code 1910, § 5471; Code 1933, § 37-1503; Ga. L. 1952, p. 90, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on trial practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 299 (1982).

23-3-91.
Verification of petition.

Every petition for interpleader shall be verified and shall show that the petitioner is not in collusion with any party claiming the property.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4897; Civil Code 1910, § 5472; Code 1933, § 37-1504.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decisions in Burton v. Black,

32 Ga. 53

(1861) and Tyus v. Rust,

37 Ga. 574

(1868).

23-3-92.
Collateral interpleader.

If, in the progress of any proceeding in equity, the court perceives the necessity for parties to interplead, it may order such interpleader as collateral and ancillary to the main case.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3157; Code 1868, § 3169; Code 1873, § 3236; Code 1882, § 3236; Civil Code 1895, § 4898; Civil Code 1910, § 5473; Code 1933, § 37-1505.

Law reviews.

For article discussing aspects of third-party practice (impleader) under the Georgia Civil Practice Act, see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 355 (1968).